hyphen-de-base/usr/share/hyphen/hyph_de_DE_OLDSPELL_base.dic
trac8h
tra8far
tr8afa
tra2f5t
1trag
tra6gl
tra6gr4
t3rahm
1trai
t6ra6ns
tra3sc
tra6st
3trau1e
t4re.
2trec
t3rec8h
t8rec2k
6t1re1d
t8ree
4t1reg
3treib
4tre2if
8t3reis
8tre1p2o
tr6e6t5r6
t3re1v
4t3re1z
1trib
t6ric2k
tri6er
tr2ie
2t1r2ig
t8rink
tri6o5d
tr2io
tri1zi5
tri1z
tro1a
3troc
trocke6
troc2k
tro5i8d
tro8man.
tro3m6an
tro1ma
tro3ny
tr2on
5tropf
6t5ro1sa
t5roß
5trub
5trup
trut5
1träg
6t1röh
5trüb
tr5ü3bu
t1rüc
t1rüs
2ts
ts1ab
t1sac
tsa8d
ts1ak
t6s5a2l1t
t1sal
ts1an
ts1ar
ts3auf
t3sc6hr
tsc8h
t5schä
tse6e
t1se
tse1e5i
tsei6n6s
ts3ent
ts1er
t8ser1f
t4se6rk
t8s1h
5t6si1k
t1si
t4s3int
ts5ort.
t1so
tso2r1t
t5s6por
tsp2
ts1p2o
t6sprei
tspr6
t1st
t6s5tanz
t1sta
t2s1th
t6stit
t1sti
t4s3tor
t1sto
1t2sua
t1su
t2s1uf
t8sum.
t2s1u8n
t2s1ur
2t1t
tt5e2if
tte6sa
tt1h6a
tt8ret
ttr6
tt1sc
t2ts
tt8s1er
tt1se
tt5s6z
1t2uc
tuch5a
tuc8h
1tu1e
6tuh
t5u6hr
t6u1i
tu6it
1tu2m1h
6t5u2m1r
1tu2ms
8tu2m1t
6tu2n1d
6tun1f
2t1unt
tu5ra
tu6rau
tu6re.
tu1re
tu4r3er
2t1v
2t1w
1ty1
ty6a
ty8la
8tym
6ty6o
2tz
tz5al
tz1an
tz1ar
t8zec
t1ze
tzeh6
tzehn5
t6z5ei.
t6zor
t1zo
t4z3um
t1zu
t6zäu
t1zä
5täg
6täh
t5ä2l1t
t8än
tä1re8
8tä8st
6t1äuß
t5öffen
tö2ff
töf5fe
8tö8k
1tön
4tüb
t6ü5b8er.
tü1b6e2
t3ü4ber1
5tüc8h
1tür.
u3al.
u5a2lb
u5al1f
u3a6l1h
u5a6l1k
u3a6l1p
u3an.
ua5na
u3a2n1d
u5a6ns
u5ar.
ua6th
u1au
ua1y
u2bab
u1ba
ubi5er.
u1bi
ub6ie
u6b5r2it
u1br
ubs2k2
u8bs
u5bö
u8büb
u1bü
2uc
u1che
uc8h
u6ch5ec
u1chi
uch1l6
u6ch3m
u2ch5n6
uc6h1r
uch5to
u2cht
ucht5re
uchtr6
u1chu
u8ch1w
uc1k1a
uc2k
uck5in
u1d
ud4a
u1ei
u6e1la
ue1ne8
u6ep
u1er
uer1a
ue8rer1l
ue1re
ue1rer
uer5o
u8e1sc
u2est
u8e1v
u1fa
u2f1ei
u1fe
u4f3ent
u8fer1h8
uf1fr6
u2ff
uf1l
uf1ra
ufr6
uf1re
uf1rä
uf1rü
uf1s2p2
u2fs
uf1st
uf2t1s
u2ft
u8ga2b1t
u1ga
u8ga1d
u6gap
uge1b8
u1ge
u8gn8
ugo3s4
u1go
u1ha
u1he
u1hi
uh1le
u1ho
uh1re
u6hr
u1hu
uh1w
u1hä
u1hö
6ui
ui5en
u1ig
u3i6ns
uin8tes
uin1te
u5i8s2ch.
uisc8h
u1j
6uk
u1ke
u1ki
u1kl8
u8klu
u1k6n8
u5ky
u1la
uld8se
u6ld
ul2ds
u1le
ul8lac
u6ll
ul1la
ul6lau
ul6le6l
ul1le
ul6lo
ul1ni8
u6ln
u1lo
ulo6i
ult6a
u2l1t
ult8e
u1lu
ul2vr
ul1v
u1lä
u1lö
3umfan
u2m1f6
5umlau
u2m1l
u8mo8f
u1mo
um8pho
u2mp
um1ph
u1mu
umu8s
u5mö
u1n1a
un2al
un6at
unau2
6und.
u2n1d
5undein
un2d1ei
un1de
un4d3um
un1du
3undzw8
un2d1z
un1dü8
un8düb
une2b
u1ne
u2n1ec
une2h
u8n3eis
3unfal
un1f
1un1fä
5unge1a2
un1ge
3un1glü
un2g2s1
un8gä
1u2n2if
u1ni
un4it
un8kro
un1kr8
un2k5s
u1no
unpa2
un1p2
uns2p2
u6ns
unvol4
un1v
unvo6ll5
u5os.
u1pa
u1pi
u1p2l8
u1pr6
u2p4s3t
up2t1a
up1t
u1q
u1ra
ur5a8b1s
ura8d
ur5ah
u6rak
ur3a2l5t
u6rana
u6r5a6ns
u8rap
ur5a6ri
u8ra2t1t
u1re
ur3eig
ur8gri
u8r1g
ur1gr4
u1ri
ur5i6ns
3urlau
ur1l
urmen6
u6r1m
ur1me
ur8nan
u2rn
ur1na
u1ro
3ursac
u2r1s
ur8sau
ur8sei
ur1se
ur4s1k2
3ur5tei
u2r1t
u1ru
ur6u5i6
u2r1u6r
u1ry
ur2za
ur6zä
ur5ä6m
u5rö
u1rü
urü8c2k3
u1sa
usa4gi
u1sag
u2s1ar
u2s1au
u8schec
u1sche
usc8h
usch5wi
us8chw
u2s1ei
u1se
use8kel
use1ke
u8s1l
u4st3a4b
u1sta
us3tau
u3s4ter
u1ste
u2s1uf
u1su
u8su2rn
ut1ac
u1tal
uta8m
u1tan
ut1ar
u1tas
ut1au
u1te
u8teic
u4tent
u8ter1f4
u6terin
ut2e1ri
u4t3hei
ut5ho
ut1hu
u1ti
uti1ne5
uti6q
u1to
uto5c
u1tr6
ut1sa
u2ts
ut1s6p2
ut6stro
ut1st
utstr6
u1tu
utz5w8
u2tz
u1u
u1v
uve5n
u1ve
uve3r4ä
uver1
u1w
u1xe
u5ya
uy5e6
u1yi
u2z1eh
u1ze
u8zer1h8
u5ö
uße6n
u1ße
uße1n5e
8van1b2
6vang
6var1b
va8r8d
v8a6t5a
va8tei
va1te
v4a2t1r6
2v1b
6v5c
6vd
1ve
6ve5g6
ver1
ver5b
verb8l8
ve2re2
ve8r1g8
v2e2ru8
ve1s
ve2s3p2
ve3xe
2v1f
2v1g
6v5h
vi6el
vie6w5
vi1g4
vi8le8h
v2il
vi1le
vil6le.
vi6ll
vil1le
8vint
vi1ru
vi1tr6
2v1k
2v1l
2v1m
4v5n
8vo8f
voi6le
vo2il
vol8le2n1d
vo6ll
vol1le
vol8li
v2or1
vo2re
vo8rin
vo1ri
vo2ro
2v1p
8vra
v6re
2v1s
2v1t
2v1v
4v3w
2v1z
waf5fe8
wa2ff
wa6g5n8
1wah
wah8n
wa5la
wal8din
wa6ld
wal1di
wal6ta
wa2l1t
wan4dr4
wa2n1d
5w2a1re
wa8ru
war4za
1was
w5c
w1d
5wec8h
we6fl
we1f
1weg
we8geng
we1ge
weg5h
weg3l
we2g1r4
weh6r5er
weh1re
we6hr
5wei1se
weit3r6
we2l2t
welt3r6
we6rat
8wer1c
5wer1du
we8rd
wer4fl
wer1f
5werk.
we6rk
wer4ka
wer8ku
wer4ta
we2r1t
wer8te6r1m
we2sp2
we8ste2n1d
we1ste
we6steu
we8str6
we8stö
wet8ta
we2t1t
wich6s5t
wic8h
wi2chs
1wi1d
wi2dr4
wie1de4
wie1d
wieder5
wi1k6
wim6ma
wi2m1m
win4d3r4
wi2n1d
5wi2r1t
wisch5l6
wisc8h
1wj
6wk
2w1l
8w1n
wo1c
wo1che6
woc8h
wol6f
wor6t5r6
wo2r1t
6ws2
w1s1k2
6w5t
5wunde.
wu2n1d
wun1de
wun6gr4
wu1sc
wu2t1
6w5w
wy5a
wär1me5
wä6r1m
wä1sc
1xag
x1ak
x3a4men
xa1me
8xa2m1t
x1an
8x1b
x1c
1xe.
x3e4g
1xen
xe1ro
x1erz
1xes
8xf
x1g
8x1h
1xi
8xi1d
xi8so
4xi1ste
x1k
6x1l
x1m
8xn
1xo
8x5o6d
8x3p2
x1r
x1s6
8x1t
x6tak
x8ter1f4
x2t1h
1xu
xu1e
x5ul
6x3w
x1z
5ya.
y5an.
y5ank
y1b
y1c
y6cha
yc8h
y4chia
y1d
yen6n
y5e2rn
y1g
y5h
y5in
y1j
y1k2
y1lak
yl1al
yla8m
y5la1x
y1le
y1lo
y5lu
y8m1n8
y2m1p2
y3mu
y1na
yno2d
yn1t
y1on.
y1o4p
y5ou
y1p2o1
y1pr6
y8ps
y1r
yr2i3e
y2r1r2
y1s
y2s5iat
y1si
ys8ty1
y1t
y3w
y1z
yä8m
z5a6b
za1b5l8
8za6d
1zah
za5is
4z3ak
6z1am
5zange.
zan1ge
8z1an5l6
2z1a1ra
6z5as
z5auf
3zaun
2z1b
6z1c
6z1d
1ze
ze4di1k
ze1d
ze1di
4z3e2ff
ze1f
8zein
zei4ta
zei8te2r1s
zei1te
ze6la
ze8lec
ze1le
zel8th
ze2l1t
4ze2mp
6z5engel
zen1ge
zen8zin
zen1zi
8zer1gä
ze8r1g
z2e1r8i
ze1ro
ze2r1s8
zerta8
ze2r1t
zer8tab
zer8tag
8zerz
ze8ste
zeu6gr4
2z1ex
2z1f8
z1g
4z1h
1zi
zi1en
zi5es.
4z3i2mp
zi1na
6z5in1f
6z5in1ni
zin6s5er
zi6ns
zin1se
8zinsuf
zin1su
zist5r6
zi5th
zi1tr6
6z1j
2z1k
2z1l
2z1m
6z1n
1zo
zo6gl
z8o1g
4z3oh
zo1on
zor6na8
zo2rn
4z1p
z5q
6z1r
2z1s8
2z1t
z4t3e2n1d
z4t3hei
z8thi
1zu
zu3al
zu1b4
zu1f2
6z5u6hr
zu1n2a
8zunem
zu1ne
zun1f8
8zungl
zu1o
zup8fi
zu1s8
zu1z
2z1v
zw8
z1wal
5zwec2k
zwei3s
z1wel
z1wer
z6we8r1g
8z5wes
1zwi
zwi1s
6z1wo
1zy
2z1z
zz8a
zzi1s
z1zi
1zä
1zö
6z1öl.
zö1le
1zü
2z1ü2b
ä1a6
äb1l8
ä1che
äc8h
ä3chi
äch8sc
ä2chs
äch8sp2
ä5chu
äc1k5a
äc2k
äd1a
äd5era
ä1de
ä6d5ia
ä1di
ä1e
ä5fa
äf1l
äf2t6s
ä2ft
äg1h
äg3le
ä6g5nan
ägn8
ä1gna
äg5str6
ä2gs
ä1he
ä1hi
äh1le
äh5ne
1ähn5l6
äh1re
ä6hr
äh5ri
äh1ru
ä1hu
äh1w
6äi
ä1isc
ä6i1sche
äisc8h
ä5i2s1m
ä5j
ä1k
ä8l1c
ä1le
ä8lei
äl6schl6
ä2ls
äl1sc
älsc8h
ämi1e
ä1mi
äm8n8
ä2m8s
ä5na
5änd2e1ru
ä2n1d
än1de
äne5i8
ä1ne
äng3l
änk5l8
ä1no
än6s5c
ä6ns
ä1pa
äp6s5c
3äq
är1c
ä1re
äre8m
5ärge2rn
ä8r1g
är1ge
är6gl
ä1ri
3ärmel
ä6r1m
är1me
ä1ro
är2t6s5
ä2r1t
ä1ru
3ärz2t1l
är2z1t
ä5rö
ä6s5chen
ä1sche
äsc8h
äse6n8s
ä1se
ä2s1th
äta8b
ä1te
ät2e1ri4
äter5it
ä6thy
ä1ti
3ä2t1k2
ä1to
ät8schl6
ä2ts
ätsc8h
äts1p2
ä5tu
äub1l8
äu1e
1äug
äu8ga
ä6u5i
ä1um.
ä1us.
1äuß
ä1z
ö1b
ö1che
öc8h
ö5chi
öch8stei
ö2chs
öch1ste
öch8str6
ö2cht6
5ö6dem
ö1de
5öf2f1n
ö2ff
ö1he
öh1l8
öh1re
ö6hr
ö1hu
ö1is
ö1ke
1ö2k2o
1öl.
öl6k5l8
ö6l1k
öl8pl8
ö6l1p
ö1mu
ö5na
öni2g6s3
ö1ni
ö1no
ö5o6t
öpf3l
öp6s5c
ö1re
ör8g1li
ö8r1g
ö1ri
ör8tr6
ö2r1t
ö1ru
5öste2rr
ö1ste
ö1te
ö5th
ö1ti
ö1tu
ö1v
ö1w
öwe8
ö2z
ü1b6e2
3ü4ber1
üb1l8
ü1b1r
5ü2bu
ü1che
üc8h
ü1chi
ü8ch3l6
üch6s5c
ü2chs
ü8c2k
üc1k1a
ück5e2r1s
üd1a2
ü6deu
ü1de
üdi8t
ü1di
ü2d1o4
ü2d5s6
üge4l5a
ü1ge
üg1l
üh5a
ü1he
ü8heh
ü6h5e6rk
üh1le
üh1re
ü6hr
üh1ru
ü1hu
üh1w
ü3k
ü1le
ül4l5a
ü6ll
ül8lo
ül4ps
ü6l1p
ül6s5c
ü2ls
ü1lu
ün8da
ü2n1d
ün8fei
ün1f
ün1fe
ünk5l8
ün8za
ün6zw8
ü5pi
ü1re
ü8rei
ür8fl
ür1f
ür8fr6
ür8geng
ü8r1g
ür1ge
ü1ri
ü1ro
ür8sta
ü2r1s
ür8ster
ür1ste
ü1ru
üse8n
ü1se
ü8sta
ü8stes
ü1ste
ü6s5te1te
ü3ta
ü1te
ü1ti
üt8tr6
ü2t1t
ü1tu
üt8zei
ü2tz
üt1ze
ü1v
ß1a8
5ßa.
ß8as
ß1b8
ß1c
ß1d
1ße
ß5ec
8ße8g
8ße8h
2ß1ei
8ßem
ß1f8
ß1g
ß1h
1ßi
ß1k
ß1l
ß1m
ßmana8
ß1ma
ß3man
ß1n
ß1o
ß1p8
ß5q
ß1r
ß1s2
ßst8
ß1ta
ß1te
ßt3hei
ß1ti
ß5to
ß1tr6
1ßu8
6ß5um
ß1v
ß1w
ß1z
